Hawaii statutes.
§712-1272 Temporary writ.
Whenever the existence of a nuisance is shown in a suit brought under this part
to the satisfaction of the court or the judge thereof, either by verified
petition or affidavit, or both, the court or judge thereof shall allow a temporary
writ of injunction to abate and prevent the continuance or recurrence of such
nuisance, which injunction may include a provision prohibiting the person or
persons causing, maintaining, aiding, abetting, or permitting the nuisance from
residing in or entering into the building, premises, or place in or upon which
the nuisance exists. The petition in such suit need not be verified, except in
those suits brought by a citizen in the citizen's own name, or those suits
brought by an organization in its own name, but shall be signed by the party
bringing the same and shall include a certification that the complainant
believes the allegations of the petition to be true. [L 1979, c 181, pt of §2;
gen ch 1993; am L 1996, c 246, §3; am L 2005, c 123, §4]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next